Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201781-2110
Installer; license; rights and privileges.

Any person holding an installer license may lay out and install electrical wiring, apparatus, and equipment for major electrical home appliances on the load side of the main service in any municipality having a population of less than one hundred thousand inhabitants as determined by the most recent federal decennial census or the most recent revised certified count by the United States Bureau of the Census.

Laws 1975, LB 525, § 11;

R.S.1943, (1976), § 81-581;

Laws 1993, LB 193, § 10;

Laws 2017, LB113, § 63.
August 24, 2017